Maine, session 132, LD383.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 5 MRSA §935, sub-§1, ¶E, as enacted by PL 1983, c. 729, §4 and amended
by PL 2011, c. 682, §38, is repealed.
Sec. 2. 5 MRSA §938, sub-§1-A, ¶H, as amended by PL 2015, c. 267, Pt. IIII, §3,
is further amended to read:
H. Director, Bureau of Water Quality; and
Sec. 3. 5 MRSA §938, sub-§1-A, ¶I, as enacted by PL 2015, c. 267, Pt. IIII, §4, is
amended to read:
I. Director, Bureau of Land Resources.; and
Sec. 4. 5 MRSA §938, sub-§1-A, ¶J is enacted to read:
J. Executive Director, Maine Land Use Planning Commission.
Sec. 5. 12 MRSA §683-A, first ¶, as amended by PL 2013, c. 256, §3, is further
amended to read:
The Maine Land Use Planning Commission, as established by Title 5, section 12004‑D,
subsection 1‑A to carry out the purposes stated in section 681, is created within the
Department of Agriculture, Conservation and Forestry Environmental Protection and in
this chapter called "the commission." The commission is charged with implementing this
chapter. The commission consists of 9 members, appointed in accordance with subsections
1 and 2. All appointments under this section are subject to review by the joint standing
committee of the Legislature having jurisdiction over conservation environment and
natural resources matters and to confirmation by the Senate.
Sec. 6. 12 MRSA §685, first ¶, as amended by PL 2011, c. 657, Pt. W, §6 and c.
682, §9, is further amended to read:
The Commissioner of Agriculture, Conservation and Forestry Environmental
Protection shall prepare a biennial budget and shall submit to the Legislature requests for
appropriations sufficient to carry out its assigned tasks. The commission may accept
contributions of any type from any source to assist it in carrying out its assigned tasks, and
make such requirements in respect to the administration of such funds, not inconsistent
with this subchapter, as are required as conditions precedent to receiving such funds,
federal or otherwise. The commission shall give public notice of all contributions, in the
state paper, stating the source, the amount and the purpose of such contributions. The
commission may contract with municipal, county, state and federal governments or their
agencies to assist in the carrying out of any of its assigned tasks. The Commissioner of
Agriculture, Conservation and Forestry Environmental Protection, with the consent of a
majority of the commission, shall appoint a director who is the principal administrative,
operational and executive employee of the commission. The director shall attend all
meetings of the commission and is permitted to participate fully but is not a voting member
of the commission.
Sec. 7. 12 MRSA §685-C, sub-§1, ¶A, as amended by PL 2021, c. 676, Pt. A,
§§23 and 24, is further amended by amending subparagraph (2) to read:
Page 1 - 132LR0604(01)

(2) Submitting the tentative plan to the Department of Agriculture, Conservation
and Forestry, Bureau of Resource Information and Land Use Planning, as
described in Title 7‑A, section 206, subsection 4, or its successor Environmental
Protection, which shall forward its comments and recommendations, if any, to the
commission within 30 days;
Sec. 8. 12 MRSA §685-C, sub-§1, ¶A, as amended by PL 2021, c. 676, Pt. A,
§§23 and 24, is further amended by amending subparagraph (4) to read:
(4) Submitting the tentative plan to the joint standing committee of the Legislature
having jurisdiction over conservation environment and natural resources matters
and the committee reviewing the plan at a public meeting. The commission shall
brief the committee on any anticipated changes to land use districts and subdistricts
based on revisions in the comprehensive land use plan and a projected timetable
for rulemaking to adopt these changes.
Sec. 9. 12 MRSA §685-C, sub-§1, ¶B-1, as enacted by PL 2013, c. 405, Pt. B, §2,
is amended to read:
B-1. After the commission has finalized a plan or a portion of a plan, but prior to
adoption, the commission shall provide a copy to the Commissioner of Agriculture,
Conservation and Forestry Environmental Protection, who shall submit the finalized
plan or a portion of the plan to the Governor for comments. The commissioner shall
submit the finalized plan or a portion of the plan including the Governor's comments
to the Legislature within 30 days after the convening of the next regular session for
approval. The Legislature shall, by act or resolve, approve, disapprove or require
changes to the plan or any portion of the plan prior to adjournment. If the plan or a
portion of the plan is approved or the Legislature fails to act on the plan or a portion of
the plan before adjournment, the plan or a portion of the plan may be finally adopted
by the commission. If the plan or a portion of the plan is disapproved or revisions are
required, the plan or a portion of the plan must be revised by the commission and
resubmitted to the Legislature for approval by act or resolve. The joint standing
committee of the Legislature having jurisdiction over conservation environment and
natural resources matters may submit legislation to implement the provisions of this
paragraph.
Sec. 10. 12 MRSA §685-G, sub-§3, as amended by PL 2009, c. 213, Pt. HHHH,
§1, is further amended to read:
3. Report. By January 15, 2009 and annually thereafter, the commission shall report
to the joint standing committees of the Legislature having jurisdiction over conservation
environment and natural resources matters and taxation matters regarding commission
funding and other financial matters. The report must cover the 5 previous fiscal years and
must identify General Fund appropriations and other resources, amounts assessed and
collected from the assessments required under this section and former section 685‑E and
amounts assessed and collected from other fees and penalties assessed under this chapter.
Beginning in January 2010, the report must include an accounting of the permitting fees
and administrative penalties collected that segregates the amounts collected from the
unorganized territories from the amounts collected from the towns and plantations and must
include recommendations to adjust the fees for the unorganized territories and for towns
and plantations based on the amounts collected for permitting fees and administrative
Page 2 - 132LR0604(01)

416 penalties from each of these entities. The joint standing committees of the Legislature
427 having jurisdiction over conservation environment and natural resources matters and
438 taxation matters shall jointly review the distribution of funding and other assessments
449 among the General Fund, unorganized territories and towns and plantations under the
550 commission's jurisdiction and may submit legislation considered necessary as a result of
561 the commission's report to the First Regular Session of the 124th Legislature.
Sec. 11. 12 MRSA §685-H, sub-§1, as enacted by PL 2011, c. 682, §24, is amended
to read:
1. Report due. By January 15, 2013 and by January 15th annually thereafter, the
commission shall report to the joint standing committee of the Legislature having
jurisdiction over conservation environment and natural resources matters regarding the
commission's performance under this subchapter for the previous year and goals for the
coming year.
Sec. 12. 12 MRSA §685-H, sub-§3, as enacted by PL 2011, c. 682, §24, is amended
to read:
3. Public meeting. The chair of the commission shall present the annual performance
report to the joint standing committee of the Legislature having jurisdiction over
conservation environment and natural resources matters at a meeting of that committee.
The committee shall give the public an opportunity to comment on the performance report
at this meeting.
Sec. 13. 12 MRSA §5011, sub-§4, as amended by PL 1993, c. 685, Pt. B, §1, is
further amended to read:
4. Mining bureau. Maine Mining Bureau; and
Sec. 14. 12 MRSA §5011, sub-§6, as amended by PL 1993, c. 685, Pt. B, §1, is
further amended to read:
6. Allagash waterway. Allagash Wilderness Waterway; and.
Sec. 15. 12 MRSA §5011, sub-§7, as amended by PL 1993, c. 685, Pt. B, §1 and
PL 2011, c. 682, §38, is repealed.
Sec. 16. 12 MRSA §5012, 3rd ¶, as amended by PL 2009, c. 213, Pt. L, §3 and PL
2011, c. 657, Pt. W, §7 and c. 682, §38, is further amended to read:
The deputy commissioner and division heads serve at the pleasure of the commissioner,
except that dismissal of the Executive Director of the Maine Land Use Planning
Commission requires the consent of a majority of the members of that commission.
Sec. 17. 12 MRSA §5013, first ¶, as enacted by PL 1973, c. 460, §16 and amended
by PL 2011, c. 657, Pt. W, §§5 and 7 and c. 682, §38, is further amended to read:
The Department of Agriculture, Conservation and Forestry shall be is composed of the
Maine Land Use Planning Commission and the following divisions:
Sec. 18. 12 MRSA §5013, sub-§1, as amended by PL 1983, c. 812, §80 and PL
2011, c. 682, §38, is repealed.
Sec. 19. 38 MRSA §342, sub-§4, ¶C is enacted to read:
Page 3 - 132LR0604(01)

C. The Maine Land Use Planning Commission as established by Title 5, chapter 379
is incorporated into the department under the direction and supervision of a director
who must be qualified by experience in land use planning and administration. The
director must be appointed by the commissioner, with the consent of a majority of the
members of the commission, for a term coterminous with the commissioner, subject to
removal for cause by the commissioner with the approval of the Governor and the
consent of a majority of the members of the commission.
Sec. 20. 38 MRSA §480-Q, sub-§5-A, ¶G, as amended by PL 2013, c. 536, §2,
is further amended by amending subparagraph (1) to read:
(1) Waters closed to motorized recreational gold prospecting in the unorganized
territories identified in rules adopted by the Department of Agriculture,
Conservation and Forestry, Maine Land Use Planning Commission;
Sec. 21. Transition provisions. The following provisions govern the transition of
the Maine Land Use Planning Commission from the Department of Agriculture,
Conservation and Forestry to the Department of Environmental Protection.
1. The members of the Maine Land Use Planning Commission serving on the effective
date of this Act continue as members of the Maine Land Use Planning Commission until
the expiration of their terms under the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 12, section 683-A,
subsection 4.
2. All existing rules, regulations and procedures in effect, in operation or adopted in
or by the Maine Land Use Planning Commission or any of its administrative units or
officers and all permits, approvals and decisions of the Maine Land Use Planning
Commission are hereby declared in effect and continue in effect until rescinded, revised or
amended by the proper authority.
3. All existing contracts, agreements and compacts currently in effect involving the
Maine Land Use Planning Commission continue in effect.
4. Any positions authorized and allocated subject to the personnel laws of the Maine
Land Use Planning Commission may continue to be authorized.
5. All records, property and equipment previously belonging to or allocated for the use
of the Maine Land Use Planning Commission remain the records, property and equipment
of the Maine Land Use Planning Commission.
6. All existing forms, licenses, permits, letterheads and similar items bearing the name
of or referring to the "Maine Land Use Planning Commission" may continue to be used by
the Maine Land Use Planning Commission.
Sec. 22. Department of Environmental Protection; recommendations
regarding consolidation with Maine Land Use Planning Commission. In
consultation with the Maine Land Use Planning Commission, referred to in this section as
"the commission," and the Department of Agriculture, Conservation and Forestry, the
Department of Environmental Protection, referred to in this section as "the department,"
shall evaluate and develop recommendations regarding the consolidation of the department
and the commission into a single combined entity, to be known as the Maine Environmental
and Land Use Commission and referred to in this section as "the combined entity." The
evaluation and recommendations must include but are not limited to the following.
Page 4 - 132LR0604(01)

1. A timeline for completion of the consolidation process, designed to ensure
consolidation of the department and the commission into the combined entity not later than
July 1, 2028;
2. Evaluation of the short-term and long-term costs and savings anticipated as a result
of the consolidation process and identification of other fiscal considerations associated with
consolidation;
3. Methods for ensuring that the combined entity is designed to prioritize landowner
rights, ensuring that private landowners are empowered to make use of their property
subject to reasonable, well-established rules for the protection of the environment. The
activities of the combined entity and its adopted rules must ensure sustainable land use
development practices and not unduly or arbitrarily restrict landowner property use except
as necessary to protect public health, safety and the environment;
4. Methods for ensuring the routine review of existing rules to identify and remove
outdated, overly complex and unnecessary provisions that are determined by the combined
entity to impede reasonable land use;
5. Provisions for establishing a landowner rights advisory board within the combined
entity to ensure that the operation of the combined entity and the rules adopted and enforced
by the combined entity are designed to uphold and protect the rights of landowners. The
advisory board must conduct an annual review of the combined entity to ensure that it is
meeting its goals of reducing regulatory burdens while protecting landowner rights and
environmental integrity;
6. Provisions for ensuring that all applications for licenses, permits or other approvals
required for construction or land use activities are processed and a determination issued by
the combined entity within 6 months from the date the application is deemed complete for
processing, with a streamlined 2-week approval process for certain activities with minimal
environmental impact. The combined entity must implement a transparent application and
approval tracking system, accessible by applicants and the public, by which information
regarding all applications, licenses, permits and other approvals may be accessed. Any
denial of approval for an applied-for license, permit or other approval must be based on
objective environmental or safety concerns, and a final decision regarding an appeal of a
denial by the applicant must be issued by the combined entity within 30 days of the date
the appeal is filed;
7. Provisions for ensuring that any rule, decision or other action by the combined entity
does not constitute an unfunded state mandate. The combined entity must consult with the
Department of Administrative and Financial Services, Bureau of the Budget prior to
adopting any rule or making any decision or action that can reasonably be expected to
impose financial burdens on landowners or businesses to identify appropriate funding to
address or develop an implementation plan to reduce those financial burdens. The
combined entity may not impose a new fee or increase an existing fee without the approval
of the Legislature. For any rule that unreasonably burdens a landowner's property use and
results in direct financial harm to the landowner, the combined entity must compensate the
landowner for that financial loss. The combined entity must establish and provide funding
for a property rights compensation fund to ensure landowner compensation for such losses;
8. Provisions for requiring any proposed new rule of the combined entity to undergo a
cost-benefit analysis to assess financial impacts on landowners, local government and
Page 5 - 132LR0604(01)

416 businesses. Any new rule adopted by the combined entity must include provisions for
427 ensuring that the rule is subject to review every 5 years, during which time the combined
438 entity must decide to renew, amend or repeal the rule based on the assessed economic
449 burden of the rule and its impact on landowner rights. All rules adopted or amended by the
550 combined entity must be designated as major substantive rules as defined in the Maine
561 Revised Statutes, Title 5, chapter 375, subchapter 2-A; and
9. Identification of all statutory, administrative, technical and other changes or actions
necessary to ensure the timely transition of the department and the commission into the
combined entity. The department shall include in the report required by this section all
draft legislation necessary to accomplish this transition and establish the combined entity.
On or before January 1, 2026, the department shall submit to the Joint Standing
Committee on Environment and Natural Resources a report outlining its recommendations,
including necessary draft legislation, regarding the consolidation of the department and the
commission into the combined entity as outlined in this section. After reviewing the report,
the committee may report out a bill relating to the report to the Second Regular Session of
the 132nd Legislature.